Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1455
Committee campaign statement; contents.

(1) The campaign statement of a committee, other than a political party committee, shall contain the following information:

(a) The filing committee's name, address, and telephone number and the full name, residential and business addresses, and telephone numbers of its committee treasurer;

(b) Under the heading RECEIPTS, the total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the campaign statement; under the heading EXPENDITURES, the total amount of expenditures made during the period covered by the campaign statement; and the cumulative amount of those totals for the election period. If a loan was repaid during the period covered by the campaign statement, the amount of the repayment shall be subtracted from the total amount of contributions received. Forgiveness of a loan shall not be included in the totals. Payment of a loan by a third party shall be recorded and reported as a contribution by the third party but shall not be included in the totals. In-kind contributions or expenditures shall be listed at fair market value and shall be reported as both contributions and expenditures;

(c) The balance of cash and cash equivalents on hand at the beginning and the end of the period covered by the campaign statement;

(d) The full name of each individual from whom contributions totaling more than two hundred fifty dollars are received during the period covered by the report, together with the individual's street address or post office box number, the amount contributed, the date on which each contribution was received, and the cumulative amount contributed by that individual for the election period;

(e) The full name of each person, except those individuals reported under subdivision (1)(d) of this section, which contributed a total of more than two hundred fifty dollars during the period covered by the report together with the person's street address or post office box number, the amount contributed, the date on which each contribution was received, and the cumulative amount contributed by the person for the election period, except that a committee named as a contributor shall be reported with the committee's street address and not with a post office box number;

(f) The name of each committee which is listed as a contributor shall include the full name of the committee's treasurer;

(g) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section: The full name and street address of each person to whom expenditures totaling more than two hundred fifty dollars were made, together with the date and amount of each separate expenditure to each such person during the period covered by the campaign statement; the purpose of the expenditure; and the full name and street address of the person providing the consideration for which any expenditure was made if different from the payee;

(h) The amount and the date of expenditures for or against a candidate or ballot question during the period covered by the campaign statement and the cumulative amount of expenditures for or against that candidate or ballot question for the election period. An expenditure made in support of more than one candidate or ballot question, or both, shall be apportioned reasonably among the candidates or ballot questions, or both; and

(i) The total amount of funds disbursed by a separate segregated political fund, by state, for the purpose of supporting or opposing candidates and committees in elections in states other than Nebraska and candidates for federal office, including independent expenditures made in such elections.

(2) For purposes of this section, election period means the calendar year of the election.

(3) A campaign statement shall include the total amount paid to individual petition circulators during the reporting period, if any, but shall not include the name, address, or telephone number of any individual petition circulator if the only payment made to such individual was for services as a petition circulator.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 55;

Laws 1988, LB 1136, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 587, § 13;

Laws 1997, LB 420, § 18;

Laws 1999, LB 416, § 7;

Laws 2008, LB39, § 6;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 9;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 25;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 52.
July 18, 2026